District of Columbia statutes.
24-922

Establishment of the BOOT CAMP.

The Director of the Department of Human Services (“Director”) shall establish a BOOT CAMP that may be used for eligible juvenile offenders who the Department of Human Services may permit to serve their commitment in the BOOT CAMP.

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 201, 40 DCR 5768
1981 Ed., § 24-822.